Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF789.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 1994HV (1) 91 jm/md H.F. 789 Section 1. Section 256E.8, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. The charter school in which the student is enrolled 3 shall receive under paragraph âcâ an amount equal to the sum 4 of the regular program state cost per pupil for the budget 5 year plus the teacher leadership supplement state cost per 6 pupil, the teacher salary supplement state cost per pupil, the 7 professional development supplement state cost per pupil, and 8 the early intervention supplement state cost per pupil for 9 the budget year as provided in section 257.9 plus any moneys 10 that would be due to the school district of residence for the 11 student as a result of the non-English speaking weighting under 12 section 280.4, subsection 3 , for the budget year multiplied by 13 the state cost per pupil for the budget year. If a student 14 is an eligible pupil under section 261E.6 , the charter school 15 shall pay the tuition reimbursement amount to an eligible 16 postsecondary institution as provided in section 261E.7 . 17 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 18 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 19 Sec. 3. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to school budget 20 years beginning on or after July 1, 2025. 21